Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,233
Employee; report property damage, injury, or death; cooperation in investigation.

When any employee is involved in any occurrence involving damage to or loss of property or personal injury or death, such employee as soon as practicable shall report full information on such occurrence to the head of the agency by which he or she is employed. The head of the agency shall furnish immediately all available information on such occurrence to the Risk Manager. All employees shall cooperate fully with the Attorney General in the investigation of all tort claims. Failure to comply with the provisions of this section shall constitute grounds for dismissal from employment.

Laws 1969, c. 756, § 25, p. 2852;

Laws 1972, LB 1334, § 8;

Laws 1981, LB 273, § 21.